Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-210
Judgment; bar against other actions.

A judgment in any jurisdiction for or against the plaintiff upon the substantive merits of any action for damages founded upon a single publication, exhibition, or utterance as described in section 20-209 shall bar any other action for damages by the same plaintiff against the same defendant founded upon the same publication, exhibition, or utterance.

Laws 1979, LB 394, § 10.